Massachusetts, session 194th, H3327.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The guard house located on the State House grounds at the corner of
Bowdoin Street and Mount Vernon Street in the city of Boston shall be designated and known as
the "Ranger Joanne Croken Guard House" in recognition of Department of Conservation and
Recreation Ranger Joanne Croken's longtime service to the commonwealth and to the state
capitol.
SECTION 2. The superintendent of the Bureau of the State House is hereby authorized
and directed, after consultation with the state house art commission as to size and content, to
install and maintain a plaque on the exterior of the guard house bearing this designation.
of 1